Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.050

Approval of contract, fee schedule.

Prior to using any contract or fee schedule in the transaction of its business with applicants, each employment agency shall obtain the director's approval for the use of such contract or fee schedule.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 5.]